Utah statutes.
48-3a-907.   Withdrawal deemed on conversion to domestic filing entity or domestic limited liability partnership.

A registered foreign limited liability company that converts to a domestic limited liability partnership or to a domestic entity that is organized, incorporated, or otherwise formed through the delivery of a record to the division for filing is deemed to have withdrawn its registration on the effective date of the conversion.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

